North Carolina statutes. Chapter 93A. Real Estate License Law.
Article 1. Real Estate Brokers and Salespersons.
§ 93A-6.
Disciplinary action by Commission.

The Commission has power to take disciplinary action. Upon its own initiative, or on the complaint of any person, the Commission may investigate the actions of any person or entity licensed under this Chapter, or any other person or entity who shall assume to act in such capacity. If the Commission finds probable cause that a licensee has violated any of the provisions of this Chapter, the Commission may hold a hearing on the allegations of misconduct.The Commission has power to suspend or revoke at any time a license issued under the provisions of this Chapter, or to reprimand or censure any licensee, if, following a hearing, the Commission adjudges the licensee to be guilty of:

Making any willful or negligent misrepresentation or any willful or negligent omission of material fact.

Making any false promises of a character likely to influence, persuade, or induce.

Pursuing a course of misrepresentation or making of false promises through agents, advertising or otherwise.

Acting for more than one party in a transaction without the knowledge of all parties for whom he or she acts.

Accepting a commission or valuable consideration as a real estate broker on provisional status for the performance of any of the acts specified in this Article or Article 4 of this Chapter, from any person except his or her broker-in-charge or licensed broker by whom he or she is employed.

Representing or attempting to represent a real estate broker other than the broker by whom he or she is engaged or associated, without the express knowledge and consent of the broker with whom he or she is associated.

Failing, within a reasonable time, to account for or to remit any monies coming into his or her possession which belong to others.

Being unworthy or incompetent to act as a real estate broker in a manner as to endanger the interest of the public.

Paying a commission or valuable consideration to any person for acts or services performed in violation of this Chapter.

Any other conduct which constitutes improper, fraudulent or dishonest dealing.

Performing or undertaking to perform any legal service, as set forth in

G.S. 84-2.1

, or any other acts constituting the practice of law.

Commingling the money or other property of his or her principals with his or her own or failure to maintain and deposit in a trust or escrow account in a bank as provided by subsection (g) of this section all money received by him or her as a real estate licensee acting in that capacity, or an escrow agent, or the custodian or manager of the funds of another person or entity which relate to or concern that person’s or entity’s interest or investment in real property, provided, these accounts shall not bear interest unless the principals authorize in writing the deposit be made in an interest bearing account and also provide for the disbursement of the interest accrued.

Failing to deliver, within a reasonable time, a completed copy of any purchase agreement or offer to buy and sell real estate to the buyer and to the seller.

Failing, at the time a sales transaction is consummated, to deliver to the broker’s client a detailed and accurate closing statement showing the receipt and disbursement of all monies relating to the transaction about which the broker knows or reasonably should know. If a closing statement is prepared by an attorney or lawful settlement agent, a broker may rely on the delivery of that statement, but the broker must review the statement for accuracy and notify all parties to the closing of any errors.

Violating any rule adopted by the Commission.

The Commission may suspend or revoke any license issued under the provisions of this Chapter or reprimand or censure any licensee when:

The licensee has obtained a license by false or fraudulent representation;

The licensee has been convicted or has entered a plea of guilty or no contest upon which final judgment is entered by a court of competent jurisdiction in this State, or any other state, of any misdemeanor or felony that involves false swearing, misrepresentation, deceit, extortion, theft, bribery, embezzlement, false pretenses, fraud, forgery, larceny, misappropriation of funds or property, perjury, or any other offense showing professional unfitness or involving moral turpitude which would reasonably affect the licensee’s performance in the real estate business;

The licensee has violated any of the provisions of

G.S. 93A-6(a)

when selling, leasing, or buying the licensee’s own property;

The broker’s unlicensed employee, who is exempt from the provisions of this Chapter under G.S. 93A-2(c)(6), has committed, in the regular course of business, any act which, if committed by the broker, would constitute a violation of

G.S. 93A-6(a)

for which the broker could be disciplined; or

The licensee, who is also licensed as an appraiser, attorney, home inspector, mortgage broker, general contractor, or member of another licensed profession or occupation, has been disciplined for an offense under any law involving fraud, theft, misrepresentation, breach of trust or fiduciary responsibility, or willful or negligent malpractice.

The Commission may appear in its own name in superior court in actions for injunctive relief to prevent any person from violating the provisions of this Chapter or rules adopted by the Commission. The superior court shall have the power to grant these injunctions even if criminal prosecution has been or may be instituted as a result of the violations, or whether the person is a licensee of the Commission.

Each broker shall maintain complete records showing the deposit, maintenance, and withdrawal of money or other property owned by the broker’s principals or held in escrow or in trust for the broker’s principals. The Commission may inspect these records periodically, without prior notice and may also inspect these records whenever the Commission determines that they are pertinent to an investigation of any specific complaint against a licensee.

When a person or entity licensed under this Chapter is accused of any act, omission, or misconduct which would subject the licensee to disciplinary action, the licensee, with the consent and approval of the Commission, may surrender the license and all the rights and privileges pertaining to it for a period of time established by the Commission. A person or entity who surrenders a license shall not thereafter be eligible for or submit any application for licensure as a real estate broker during the period of license surrender.

In any contested case in which the Commission takes disciplinary action authorized by any provision of this Chapter, the Commission may also impose reasonable conditions, restrictions, and limitations upon the license, registration, or approval issued to the disciplined person or entity. In any contested case concerning an application for licensure, time share project registration, or school, sponsor, instructor, or course approval, the Commission may impose reasonable conditions, restrictions, and limitations on any license, registration, or approval it may issue as a part of its final decision.

A broker’s trust or escrow account shall be a demand deposit account in a federally insured depository institution lawfully doing business in this State which agrees to make its records of the broker’s account available for inspection by the Commission’s representatives.

The Executive Director shall transmit a certified copy of all final orders of the Commission suspending or revoking licenses issued under this Chapter to the clerk of superior court of the county in which the licensee maintains his or her principal place of business. The clerk shall enter the order upon the judgment docket of the county.

History.

1957, c. 744, s. 6; 1967, c. 281, s. 4; c. 853, s. 3; 1969, c. 191, s. 5; 1971, c. 86, s. 2; 1973, c. 1112; c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 28; 1979, c. 616, ss. 6, 7; 1981, c. 682, s. 15; 1983, c. 81, s. 13; 1987, c. 516, ss. 1, 2; 1989, c. 563, s. 2; 1993, c. 419, s. 10; 1999-229, s. 6; 2000-149, s. 19(b); 2001-487, s. 23(b); 2002-168, s. 5; 2005-374, s. 2; 2005-395, s. 9; 2011-217, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-374, s. 2, effective September 8, 2005, deleted “salespersons” following “agents” in subdivision (a)(3); deleted “or salesperson” following “broker” in subdivision (a)(8); substituted “custodian or manager of the funds of another person or entity which relate to or concern that person’s or entity’s interest or investment in real property” for “temporary custodian of the funds of others, in a real estate transaction” in subdivision (a)(12); and made a minor punctuation change.

Session Laws 2011-217, s. 6, effective January 1, 2012, in subdivision (a)(5), substituted “real estate broker on provisional status” for “real estate salesperson”; in subdivision (a)(12), substituted “a bank as provided by subsection (g) of this section” for “an insured bank or savings and loan association in North Carolina”; rewrote subdivision (a)(14), which formerly read: “Failing, at the time the transaction is consummated, to deliver to the seller in every real estate transaction, a complete detailed closing statement showing all of the receipts and disbursements handled by him or her for the seller or failing to deliver to the buyer a complete statement showing all money received in the transaction from the buyer and how and for what it was disbursed”; in subdivision (a)(15), substituted “any rule adopted by the Commission” for “any rule or regulation promulgated by the Commission” and deleted the last paragraph in subsection (a), which pertained to duty of the Executive Director to transmit a certified copy of all final orders; rewrote subsection (b); in subsection (c), substituted “adopted” for “promulgated” in the first sentence; in subsection (e), deleted “or salesperson” following “real estate broker” in the last sentence; and added subsections (g) and (h).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Offer to Purchase and Contract: Buyer Beware,” see 8 Campbell L. Rev. 473 (1986).

§ 93A-6.1.
Commission may subpoena witnesses, records, documents, or other materials.

The Commission, Executive Director, or other representative designated by the Commission may issue a subpoena for the appearance of witnesses deemed necessary to testify concerning any matter to be heard before or investigated by the Commission. The Commission may issue a subpoena ordering any person in possession of records, documents, or other materials, however maintained, that concern any matter to be heard before or investigated by the Commission to produce the records, documents, or other materials for inspection or deliver the same into the custody of the Commission’s authorized representatives. Upon written request, the Commission shall revoke a subpoena if it finds that the evidence, the production of which is required, does not relate to a matter in issue, or if the subpoena does not describe with sufficient particularity the evidence, the production of which is required, or if for any other reason in law the subpoena is invalid. If any person shall fail to fully and promptly comply with a subpoena issued under this section, the Commission may apply to any judge of the superior court resident in any county where the person to whom the subpoena is issued maintains a residence or place of business for an order compelling the person to show cause why he or she should not be held in contempt of the Commission and its processes. The court shall have the power to impose punishment for acts that would constitute direct or indirect contempt if the acts occurred in an action pending in superior court.

The Commission shall be exempt from the requirements of Chapter 53B of the General Statutes with regard to subpoenas issued to compel the production of a licensee’s trust account records held by any financial institution. Notwithstanding the exemption, whenever the Commission issues a subpoena under this subsection, the Commission shall send a copy to the licensee at his or her address of record by regular mail.

History.

1999-229, s. 7; 2005-395, s. 10; 2011-217, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-395, s. 10, effective April 1, 2006, added “or deliver the same into the custody of the Commission’s authorized representative” at the end of the second sentence in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2011-217, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012, in subsection (b), rewrote the second sentence, which formerly read: “Notwithstanding that exemption, the Commission shall serve, pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4(j) of the N.C. Rules of Civil Procedure or by certified mail to the licensee’s last known address, a copy of the subpoena and notice that the subpoena has been served upon the financial institution,” and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Service of the subpoena and notice on the licensee shall be made within 10 days following service of the subpoena on the financial institution holding the trust account records.”

§ 93A-7.
Power of courts to revoke.

Whenever any person, partnership, association or corporation claiming to have been injured or damaged by the gross negligence, incompetency, fraud, dishonesty or misconduct on the part of any licensee following the calling or engaging in the business herein described and shall file suit upon such claim against such licensee in any court of record in this State and shall recover judgment thereon, such court may as part of its judgment or decree in such case, if it deem it a proper case in which so to do, order a written copy of the transcript of record in said case to be forwarded by the clerk of court to the chairman of the said Commission with a recommendation that the licensee’s certificate of license be revoked.

History.

1957, c. 744, s. 7; 1983, c. 81, s. 2.

§ 93A-8.
Penalty for violation of Chapter.

Any person violating

G.S. 93A-1

shall upon conviction thereof be deemed guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1957, c. 744, s. 8; 1993, c. 539, s. 657; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2019-198, s. 7.

§ 93A-9.
Licensing foreign brokers.

The Commission may issue a broker license to an applicant licensed in a foreign jurisdiction who has satisfied the requirements for licensure set out in

G.S. 93A-4

or such other requirements as the Commission in its discretion may by rule require.

The Commission may issue a limited broker’s license to a person or an entity from another state or territory of the United States without regard to whether that state or territory offers similar licensing privileges to residents in North Carolina if the person or entity satisfies all of the following:

Is of good moral character and licensed as a real estate broker or salesperson in good standing in another state or territory of the United States.

Only engages in business as a real estate broker in North Carolina in transactions involving commercial real estate and while the person or entity is affiliated with a resident North Carolina real estate broker.

Complies with the laws of this State regulating real estate brokers and rules adopted by the Commission.The Commission may require an applicant for licensure under this subsection to pay a fee not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300.00). All licenses issued under this subsection shall expire on June 30 of each year following issuance or on a date that the Commission deems appropriate unless the license is renewed pursuant to the requirements of

G.S. 93A-4

. A person or entity licensed under this subsection may be disciplined by the Commission for violations of this Chapter as provided in

G.S. 93A-6

and

G.S. 93A-54

.Any person or entity licensed under this subsection shall be affiliated with a resident North Carolina real estate broker, and the resident North Carolina real estate broker shall actively and personally supervise the licensee in a manner that reasonably assures that the licensee complies with the requirements of this Chapter and rules adopted by the Commission. A person or entity licensed under this subsection shall not, however, be affiliated with a resident North Carolina real estate provisional broker. The Commission may exempt applicants for licensure under this subsection from examination and the other licensing requirements under

G.S. 93A-4

. The Commission may adopt rules as it deems necessary to give effect to this subsection, including rules establishing: (i) qualifications for licensure; (ii) licensure and renewal procedures; (iii) requirements for continuing education; (iv) conduct of persons and entities licensed under this subsection and their affiliated resident real estate brokers; (v) a definition of commercial real estate; and (vi) any requirements or limitations on affiliation between resident real estate brokers and persons or entities seeking licensure under this subsection.

History.

1957, c. 744, s. 9; 1967, c. 281, s. 5; 1969, c. 191, s. 6; 1971, c. 86, s. 3; 1983, c. 81, s. 2; 2000-140, s. 19(b); 2003-361, s. 3; 2005-395, s. 11; 2011-217, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-395, s. 11, effective April 1, 2006, in subsection (a), deleted “and salespersons” following “brokers” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; deleted “or salesperson’s” following “broker’s” in the first sentence of subsection (b); deleted “or salesperson” following “broker” twice in subdivision (b)(2); deleted “salespersons and” following “brokers and” in subdivision (b)(3); and in the last paragraph of the section, deleted “or salesperson” following “broker” twice, deleted “or salespersons” following “brokers” twice, and added the present second sentence.

Session Laws 2011-217, s. 8, effective January 1, 2012, rewrote subsection (a), which pertained to applicants from another state.

§ 93A-10.
Nonresident licensees; filing of consent as to service of process and pleadings.

Every nonresident applicant shall file an irrevocable consent that suits and actions may be commenced against such applicant in any of the courts of record of this State, by the service of any process or pleading authorized by the laws of this State in any county in which the plaintiff may reside, by serving the same on the Executive Director of the Commission, said consent stipulating and agreeing that such service of such process or pleadings on said Executive Director shall be taken and held in all courts to be valid and binding as if due service had been made personally upon the applicant in this State. This consent shall be duly acknowledged, and, if made by a corporation, shall be executed by an officer of the corporation. The signature of the officer on the consent to service instrument shall be sufficient to bind the corporation and no further authentication is necessary. An application from a corporation or other business entity shall be signed by an officer of the corporation or entity or by an individual designated by the Commission. In all cases where process or pleadings shall be served, under the provisions of this Chapter, upon the Executive Director of the Commission, such process or pleadings shall be served in duplicate, one of which shall be filed in the office of the Commission and the other shall be forwarded immediately by the Executive Director of the Commission, by registered mail, to the last known business address of the nonresident licensee against which such process or pleadings are directed.

History.

1957, c. 744, s. 10; 1983, c. 81, ss. 3, 10; 2003-361, s. 4.

§ 93A-11.
Reimbursement by real estate independent contractor of brokers’ workers’ compensation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 97-21

or any other provision of law, a real estate broker may include in the governing contract with a real estate broker on provisional status whose nonemployee status is recognized pursuant to section 3508 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 3508, an agreement for the broker on provisional status to reimburse the broker for the cost of covering that broker on provisional status under the broker’s workers’ compensation coverage of the broker’s business.

Nothing in this section shall affect a requirement under any other law to provide workers’ compensation coverage or in any manner exclude from coverage any person, firm, or corporation otherwise subject to the provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 97 of the General Statutes.

History.

1995, c. 127, s. 1; 2000-140, s. 19(b); 2011-217, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-217, s. 9, effective January 1, 2012, thrice substituted “real estate broker on provisional status” for “real estate salesperson” in subsection (a).

§ 93A-12.
Disputed monies.

An escrow agent may deposit with the clerk of court in accordance with this section monies, other than a residential security deposit, the ownership of which are in dispute and that were received while the escrow agent was acting in a fiduciary capacity.

The disputed monies shall be deposited with the clerk of court in the county in which the property for which the disputed monies are being held is located. At the time of depositing the disputed monies, the escrow agent shall certify to the clerk of court that the persons claiming ownership of the disputed monies have been notified in accordance with subsection (c) of this section that the disputed monies are to be deposited with the clerk of court and that the persons may initiate a special proceeding with the clerk of court to recover the disputed monies.

Notice to the persons claiming ownership to the disputed monies required under subsection (b) of this section shall be provided by delivering a copy of the notice to the person or by mailing it to the person by first-class mail, postpaid, properly addressed to the person at the person’s last known address.

An escrow agent shall not deposit disputed monies with the clerk of court until 90 days following notification of the persons claiming ownership of the disputed monies.

Upon the filing of a special proceeding to recover the disputed monies, the clerk shall determine the rightful ownership of the monies and distribute the disputed monies accordingly. If no special proceeding is filed with the clerk of court within one year of the disputed monies being deposited with the clerk of court, the disputed monies shall be deemed unclaimed and shall be delivered by the clerk of court to the State Treasurer in accordance with the provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 116B of the General Statutes.

As used in this section, “escrow agent” means any of the following:

A real estate broker licensed under this Chapter.

An attorney licensed to practice law in this State.

A title insurance company or title insurance agent licensed to conduct business in this State.

History.

2005-395, s. 12; 2011-350, s. 1; 2021-91, s. 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-350, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011, in subsections (a), (b), and (d), inserted “or attorney” following “broker”; and in subsection (a), inserted “or an attorney licensed to practice law in this State.”

Session Laws 2021-91, s. 11, effective October 1, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “An escrow agent for “A real estate broker licensed under this Chapter or an attorney licensed to practice law in this State” and “were received while the escrow agent was” for “the real estate broker or attorney received while”; in subsection (b), substituted “escrow agent” for “real estate broker or attorney,” and deleted “who are” preceding “claiming ownership”; deleted “who are” preceding “ownership” in subsection (c); substituted “An escrow agent” for “A real estate broker or attorney” in subsection (d); and added subsection (f).

§ 93A-13.
Contracts for broker services.

No action between a broker and the broker’s client for recovery under an agreement for broker services is valid unless the contract is reduced to writing and signed by the party to be charged or by some other person lawfully authorized by the party to sign.

History.

2011-165, s. 2.

§§ 93A-14,
93A-15.

Reserved for future codification purposes.